Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.280

Tax deeds to cities and towns absolute despite reversionary provision.

All sales of tax-title lands heretofore consummated by any county, to a city or town, for municipal purposes, or public use, shall be absolute and final, and transfer title in fee, notwithstanding any reversionary provision in the tax deed to the contrary; and all tax-title deeds containing any such reversionary provision shall upon application of grantee in interest, be revised to conform with the provisions herein.

[ 1961 c 15 s 84.64.450. Prior: 1947 c 269 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 11295-2. Formerly RCW 84.64.450.]